Utah statutes.
76-6-803.30.   Failure to return library material as library theft -- Notice -- Failure to pay replacement value -- Written notice.

(1)  A person is guilty of library theft when, having possession or having been in possession of library materials, he:

(a)  fails to return the materials within 30 days after receiving written notice demanding return of the materials; or

(b)  if the materials are lost or destroyed, fails to pay the replacement value of the materials within 30 days after being notified.

(2)  Written notice is considered received upon the sworn affidavit of the person delivering the notice with a statement as to the date, place, and manner of delivery, or upon proof that the notice was mailed postage prepaid, via the United States Postal Service, to the current address listed for the person in the library records.

